test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kualus_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - kuálus: # 2A d -k, l > l'l
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuálus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuállus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuállus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuállusân                      #kuálusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuállusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuállusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuállusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess: kuálusin                          #kuállusin
    kuálus+N+Par: kuálusid                          #kuállusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuálluseh                      #kuáluseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuállusij                      #kuálusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuállusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuállusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuállusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuállusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuállusijttáá
    
    
